Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2195
Security for refund.

The court in its discretion may require all or any of the parties, before they receive the money arising from any sale authorized in sections 25-2170 to 25-21,111, to give satisfactory security to refund such money with interest, in case it afterward appears that such parties were not entitled thereto.

R.S.1867, Code § 828, p. 540;

R.S.1913, § 8311;

C.S.1922, § 9263;

C.S.1929, § 20-2195;

R.S.1943, § 25-2195.